test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verbOdd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Odd-syllable -it verbs (the impersonla odd-syllable verbs are in another test). Lexicon UNNEDIT_TV,MUJTATJIT_TV, VUORDDELIT_TV, BÅNJÅDIT_TV,  BÁHTARIT_IV, JÅLLÅRIT_IV, LASSÁNIT_IV, SUOGNALIT_IV, BALÁDIT_IV, BEGATJIT

Tests:
  Verb - sliggudit: # UNNEDIT_TV
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Inf: sliggudit 
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Sup: sliggudittjat
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ger: sliggudattijn
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+PrfPrc: sliggudam
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+PrsPrc: sliggudiddje
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess: [sliggudime, sliggudimen]
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela: sliggudimes
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+VAbess: sliggudik
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sliggudav
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sligguda
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sliggut
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du1: sliggudin 
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du2: sliggudihppe
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du3: sliggudibá
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sliggudi
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sliggudiv
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sliggudi
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sliggudij
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1: sliggudijma 
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2: sliggudijda
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sliggudin
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg2: sligguda
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl1: sliggudip
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl2: [sliggudit,sliggudihtit]
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl3: sliggudisá
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl2: sligguduhtut
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl3: sliggudusá
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl1: sliggudittjap
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl2: sliggudittjabihtit
    sliggudit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl3: sliggudittji
    sliggudit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sligguduváv
    sliggudit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: sliggudalulu
    sliggudit+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: sliggudalulujma

  Verb - buonjádit: # MUJTATJIT_TV
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Inf: buonjádit 
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Sup: buonjádittjat
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ger: buonjádattijn
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+PrfPrc: buonjádam
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+PrsPrc: buonjádiddje
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess: [buonjádime, buonjádimen]
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela: buonjádimes
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+VAbess: buonjádik
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg1: buonjádav
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg2: buonjáda
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: buonját
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du1: buonjádin 
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du2: buonjádihppe
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du3: buonjádibá
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl3: buonjádi
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg1: buonjádiv
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg2: buonjádi
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3: buonjádij
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1: buonjádijma 
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2: buonjádijda
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl3: buonjádin
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg2: buonjáda
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl1: buonjádip
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl2: [buonjádit,buonjádihtit]
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl3: buonjádisá
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl2: buonjáduhtut
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl3: buonjádusá
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl1: buonjádittjap
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl2: buonjádittjabihtit
    buonjádit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl3: buonjádittji
    buonjádit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: buonjáduváv
    buonjádit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: buonjádalulu
    buonjádit+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: buonjádalulujma

  Verb - doalvvolit: # VUORDDELIT_TV
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Inf: doalvvolit
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Sup: doalvvolittjat
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ger: doalvvolattijn
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+PrfPrc: doalvvolam
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+PrsPrc: doalvvoliddje
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess: [doalvvolime, doalvvolimen]
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela: doalvvolimes
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+VAbess: doalvvolik
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg1: doalvvolav
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg2: doalvvola
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: doalvvol
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du1: doalvvolin 
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du2: doalvvolihppe
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du3: doalvvolibá
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl3: doalvvoli
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg1: doalvvoliv
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg2: doalvvoli
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3: doalvvolij
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1: doalvvolijma 
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2: doalvvolijda
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl3: doalvvolin
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg2: doalvvola
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl1: doalvvolip
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl2: [doalvvolit,doalvvolihtit]
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl3: doalvvolisá
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl2: doalvvoluhtut
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl3: doalvvolusá
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl1: doalvvolittjap
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl2: doalvvolittjabihtit
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl3: doalvvolittji
    doalvvolit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: doalvvoluváv
    doalvvolit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: doalvvolalulu
    doalvvolit+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: doalvvolalulujma

  Verb - dámadit: # BÅNJÅDIT_TV
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Inf: dámadit 
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Sup: dámadittjat
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ger: dámadattijn
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+PrfPrc: dámadam
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+PrsPrc: dámadiddje
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess: [dámadime, dámadimen]
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela: dámadimes
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+VAbess: dámadik
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg1: dámadav
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg2: dámada
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: dámat
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du1: dámadin 
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du2: dámadihppe
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du3: dámadibá
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl3: dámadi
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg1: dámadiv
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg2: dámadi
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dámadij
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1: dámadijma 
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2: dámadijda
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl3: dámadin
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg2: dámada
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl1: dámadip
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl2: [dámadit,dámadihtit]
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl3: dámadisá
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl2: dámaduhtut
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl3: dámadusá
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl1: dámadittjap
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl2: dámadittjabihtit
    dámadit+V+TV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl3: dámadittji
    dámadit+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: dámaduváv
    dámadit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: dámadalulu
    dámadit+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: dámadalulujma

  Verb - æjvvárit: # BÁHTARIT_IV
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Inf: [æjvvárit, äjvvárit]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Sup: [æjvvárittjat, äjvvárittjat]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ger: [æjvvárattijn, äjvvárattijn]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+PrfPrc: [æjvváram, äjvváram]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+PrsPrc: [æjvváriddje, äjvváriddje]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess: [æjvvárime, æjvvárimen, äjvvárime, äjvvárimen]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela: [æjvvárimes, äjvvárimes]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+VAbess: [æjvvárik, äjvvárik]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [æjvvárav, äjvvárav]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [æjvvára, äjvvára]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [æjvvár, äjvvár]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du1: [æjvvárin, äjvvárin]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du2: [æjvvárihppe, äjvvárihppe]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du3: [æjvváribá, äjvváribá]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [æjvvári, äjvvári]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [æjvváriv, äjvváriv]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [æjvvári, äjvvári]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [æjvvárij, äjvvárij]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1: [æjvvárijma, äjvvárijma]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2: [æjvvárijda, äjvvárijda]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [æjvvárin, äjvvárin]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg2: [æjvvára, äjvvára]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl1: [æjvvárip, äjvvárip]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl2: [æjvvárit, æjvvárihtit, äjvvárit, äjvvárihtit]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl3: [æjvvárisá, äjvvárisá]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl2: [æjvváruhtut, äjvváruhtut]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl3: [æjvvárusá, äjvvárusá]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl1: [æjvvárittjap, äjvvárittjap]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl2: [æjvvárittjabihtit, äjvvárittjabihtit]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl3: [æjvvárittji, äjvvárittji]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [æjvváruvvá, äjvváruvvá]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: [æjvváralulu, äjvváralulu]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: [æjvváralulujma, äjvváralulujma]

  Verb - budáldit: # JÅLLÅRIT_IV
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Inf: budáldit 
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Sup: budáldittjat
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ger: budáldattijn
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+PrfPrc: budáldam
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+PrsPrc: budáldiddje
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ess: [budáldime, budáldimen]
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Actio+Ela: budáldimes
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+VAbess: budáldik
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg1: budáldav
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg2: budálda
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3: budált
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du1: budáldin 
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du2: budáldihppe
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Du3: budáldibá
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Pl3: budáldi
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg1: budáldiv
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg2: budáldi
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Sg3: budáldij
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du1: budáldijma 
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Du2: budáldijda
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prt+Pl3: budáldin
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Sg2: budálda
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl1: budáldip
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl2: [budáldit,budáldihtit]
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Imprt+Pl3: budáldisá
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl2: budálduhtut
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+Pl3: budáldusá
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl1: budáldittjap
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl2: budáldittjabihtit
    budáldit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Pot+Pl3: budáldittji
    budáldit+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [budálduvvá]
    budáldit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: budáldalulu
    budáldit+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: budáldalulujma
